Ohio, session 136, HB492.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio: Section 1. That section 4513.36 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 4513.36. (A) As used in this section, "peace officer" has the same meaning as in section 2935.01 of the Revised Code. (B) No person shall resist, hinder, obstruct, or abuse any sheriff, constable, or other official peace officer while that official peace officer is attempting to arrest offenders under an offender for a violation of any provision of sections 4511.01 to 4511.78, 4511.99, and 4513.01 to 4513.37 section contained in Title XLV of the Revised Code or a violation of a municipal ordinance that is substantially equivalent to any section contained in Title XLV of the Revised Code. No person shall interfere with any person charged under any provision of any of those sections with the enforcement of the law relative to public highways. (B) (C)(1)(a) No operator of a motor vehicle, streetcar, trackless trolley, motorcycle, under-speed vehicle, motorized bicycle or moped, motor-driven cycle or motor scooter, all-purpose vehicle, utility vehicle, mini-truck, snowmobile, watercraft, or aircraft shall refuse to disclose the operator's name, address, or date of birth when requested by a peace officer who reasonably suspects that the operator has committed a violation of any section contained in Title XLV of the Revised Code or a violation of a municipal ordinance that is substantially equivalent to any section contained in Title XLV of the Revised Code. (b) No passenger of a motor vehicle, streetcar, trackless trolley, motorcycle, under-speed vehicle, motorized bicycle or moped, motor-driven cycle or motor scooter, all-purpose vehicle, utility vehicle, mini-truck, snowmobile, watercraft, or aircraft shall refuse to disclose the passenger's name, address, or date of birth when requested by a peace officer who reasonably suspects that the passenger has committed a violation of any section contained in Title XLV of the Revised Code or a violation of a municipal ordinance that is substantially equivalent to any section contained in Title XLV of the Revised Code. (2) Nothing in division (C)(1) of this section requires an operator or a passenger to answer any questions beyond that operator's or passenger's name, address, or date of birth. (3) It is not a violation of division (C)(1) of this section for an operator or passenger to refuse to answer a question that would reveal that operator's or passenger's age or date of birth if age is an element of the crime that the operator or passenger is suspected of committing. (D)(1) Whoever violates division (B) of this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor of the second degree. (2) Whoever violates division (C)(1) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. Section 2. That existing section 4513.36 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed. Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives. President ___________________ of the Senate. Passed ________________________, 20____ Approved ________________________, 20____ Governor. The section numbering of law of a general and permanent nature is complete and in conformity with the Revised Code. Director, Legislative Service Commission. Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____ day of ___________, A. D. 20____. Secretary of State. File No. _________	Effective Date ___________________